third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 860 N 5
SFX 860 0 стам .
SFX 860 0 станд .
SFX 860 0 стед .
SFX 860 0 стем .
SFX 860 0 сти .

SFX 861 N 2
SFX 861 0 ямро .
SFX 861 0 ямрову .

SFX 862 N 7
SFX 862 0 иам .
SFX 862 0 иаму .
SFX 862 0 иаш .
SFX 862 0 иашон .
SFX 862 0 иашону .
SFX 862 0 иашу .
SFX 862 0 ию .

SFX 863 N 4
SFX 863 0 иям .
SFX 863 0 ияму .
SFX 863 0 ияш .
SFX 863 0 ияшу .

REP 1
REP д т
