third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
қасосгир/852,104,855,853,862
қафас/25,35,36,7,29,337,341,859,863,552,14,787
қимат/25,852,857,4,5,7,8,229,237,241,29,859,862,853,855,863,539,540,569,14,742,752,15,777
қудо/25,33,6,9,223,859,14,861,23
ӯ/9,14,846,860,16,18,20,851
ҳақгӯ/852,9,30,859,344,853,855,863,16,18
ҳавобаланд/852,4,862,853,855,31,627,633,15
ҳамбол/852,859,863,31
ҳамерафт/4,862,15
ҳампаҳлӯ/859,18,861,23
ҳамроз/2,7,29,11,859,863,31,15
ҳамшаҳр/852,6,7,859,344,853,409,855,863
ҳаст/852,64,2,91,4,94,10,11,859,344,862,853,855,863,856,538,14,15
ҳисобот/25,852,8,29,859,855,853,862,14
ҳомиладор/852,2,29,859,862,853,855,863,31,14,15
ҳунарнамо/852,859,344,402,855,853,863
ҷавоб/25,852,64,2,857,94,5,7,8,229,231,29,859,862,853,855,524,525,699,14,15
ҷавон/25,852,35,36,64,65,70,75,2,3,857,4,5,7,195,29,10,11,859,344,862,853,855,863,856,552,580,31,627,14,742,743,751,752,15
ҷаннат/25,2,7,29,859,453,863,531,696,14,15
ҷарроҳ/852,29,859,344,862,853,402,855,524,863,31,14,15
ҷинояткор/852,29,859,344,853,855,862,31,627,14,15
ҷори/9,859,14,846,860
ҷузъиётписанд/862
ҷустуҷӯ/25,852,9,29,859,855,853,862,14,846,16,18,861,20,21,23
ғизо/25,852,9,29,859,862,853,402,855,863,569,571,14,846,16,21,22,23,24
ғул/25,4,859,356,855,421,862,15,787
ақидарон/852,862,855,863
абрӯ/25,27,9,859,14,16,18,861,21,23
адад/25,852,94,4,7,8,29,859,862,853,402,855,863,569,14
азодор/852,4,859,853,855,863,31
амал/25,852,2,3,857,94,4,5,7,8,29,859,853,862,855,863,31,14,15
амон/33,852,3,4,5,7,8,254,29,11,859,344,853,855,862,584,585,586,597,598,699,14,15
амрико/852,9,859,344,862,853,409,855,863,856,14,846,16
арзон/852,64,70,5,7,11,859,853,855,862,863,14,742,752,15
асаб/25,852,2,3,6,7,8,29,859,853,411,855,862,856,31,14,15
асл/25,852,2,94,4,7,8,29,11,859,862,853,402,855,856,863,580,14,15
баҳор/25,852,75,2,4,5,7,224,254,257,29,859,862,853,414,855,453,463,580,31,627,633,696,14,15
баҳр/25,852,2,3,5,6,7,8,29,859,853,402,409,855,468,863,556,559,696,14,15
байналмилал/852,859,853,402,855,862
барбанд/852,1,56,2,10,11,863
барор/25,852,1,2,839,4,104,858,5,6,7,10,11,12,859,862,474,569,15
беҳдошт/852,8,859,853,855,862
бегуноҳ/852,2,857,4,5,8,29,859,853,862,855,863,31,14,752,15
безабон/35,4,29,859,344,862,853,863,31,15
бекас/852,2,4,29,859,344,853,855,863,31,14,15
беодам/852,29,859,862,15
бефарҳанг/344,855,862,15
бибахш/1,2,4,10,11,366,863,580
биби/25,33,2,3,857,5,6,7,8,9,30,859,14,777,787,16,18,861,21,23
бигзашт/35,2,94,853,862,15
биёр/1,2,4,10,11,862,863,15
бифрӯш/4,11,863
бобо/25,33,852,9,223,311,312,313,314,315,30,319,859,855,853,863,14,777,781,783,16,822,18,19,861,21,22,23,24
бобул/852,344,409,413,855,453,862,584,14
бовар/25,852,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,11,29,859,862,853,402,855,444,863,540,569,571,15,786,813
бозгӯ/852,11,859,855,863,16,18
боло/25,852,9,223,29,859,344,853,862,402,855,426,863,14,846,742,744,751,752,16,822,18,861,21,23,24
босифат/7,29,859,862,14,742,15
буғ/25,852,7,859,863,580,14,759,15
бутпараст/852,29,862,853,31,627
воҳимапараст/862
вожунабахт/863
гӯ/852,9,29,10,11,30,323,326,12,859,344,853,403,855,474,475,862,863,16,17,18,848,20,831,833,835,837,849,21
гармшав/852,344,855,862
гиро/9,29,382,402,474,475,502,863,846,742,16,17,18,20,831,23
гулӯ/25,9,859,14,846,18,19,861,22,21,23,24
густох/852,2,195,29,859,344,862,853,402,855,863,31,627,15
гуфтугӯ/25,852,9,29,337,859,862,855,14,846,16,18,861,21,24
давлатдор/852,29,859,344,853,862,402,855,863,31,15
дандонсоз/859,855,862
дарё/25,852,7,147,175,9,29,11,859,853,402,862,552,555,559,14,846,860,787,789,796,16,18,21
дасткӯтаҳ/852,4,862
дилбардор/852,104,344,862,855,863,627
дилсӯз/852,2,4,5,8,29,859,344,853,402,855,862,863,627,31,14,742,751,752,15
донишомӯз/852,859,862,855,853,31,14
доно/33,852,9,29,30,859,853,855,863,14,846,742,744,751,752,16,822,18
душман/25,852,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,195,231,29,859,344,853,402,855,862,31,627,14,742,752,15
зад/852,35,36,39,43,2,94,95,97,4,842,123,858,5,7,10,11,853,862,863,15
заминпобелкун/862
зиё/852,4,9,29,311,313,314,859,853,409,413,855,862,863,699,14,846,16
зиндаги/25,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,9,29,30,859,855,14,846,16,18,861,20,21,22,23,24
зинокор/852,29,862,31,14,15
ибораоро/862
ибтидо/25,852,94,9,29,859,853,862,402,855,863,14,846,16,18,23
инсонпарвар/852,853,862,31,627,14,15
ихтиёр/25,852,2,3,857,94,5,6,7,8,29,859,862,853,409,855,627,31,699,14,15
кӯтаҳдаст/859,863
камбарқ/852,855,853,862
касал/25,852,140,29,859,344,345,853,862,402,855,863,539,540,541,546,14,15
кешбоф/852,862
ки/25,2,9,29,11,14,846,737,860,16,18,20,21
корбар/852,104,859,862,853,855
коркун/852,104,29,859,855,863,31
куҷо/25,852,9,29,10,11,859,853,862,14,846,860,16,18,20,21
курк/5,862
лозим/852,35,58,2,4,8,859,853,855,862,856,863,31,14,742,15
луқмон/859,862,586,14,15
магнит/852,859,402,855,853,862
манзур/25,33,2,3,6,7,8,29,859,863,14,15,777
мардумфиреб/852,853,862,31
матбах/7,859,409,855,863,15
маъни/25,2,7,8,9,29,859,14,846,16,18,861,23
маъюс/852,7,29,859,402,862,31,627,14,742,15
меҷӯ/852,10,11,860,17,18,20
медаро/852,10,11,859,862,17,18,20
мехон/852,1,2,839,4,10,11,862,863,31,649
милли/3,4,7,8,9,29,859,14,846,860,16,21,23
мо/25,852,4,9,10,11,30,859,853,14,846,737,860,16,18,20
момо/33,9,29,859,14,787,16,18,19,861,21,23
монанд/852,2,4,5,7,8,29,859,345,344,402,855,853,862,14,15
мукофотпул/852,859,344,855,862
мункир/4,859,863,15
наҳв/852,29,859,855,862,15
наврас/25,852,82,4,7,29,859,344,862,853,366,369,378,855,863,31,14,15
надон/852,1,2,839,4,104,10,11,859,862
намуд/25,852,35,36,39,2,94,95,97,4,842,858,5,7,8,29,10,11,859,853,862,863,684,14,15
напаймо/852,862,17
ниҳ/852,1,2,839,4,104,842,10,11,859,863
нигаҳдор/852,104,115,5,7,859,862,855,863,15
нокас/25,852,2,29,859,344,853,855,862,31,627,14,15
ноумед/852,2,859,344,862,853,855,863,31,627,15
нофаҳм/852,4,344,853,369,374,402,855,862,14
ободкор/852,4,29,859,344,862,853,855,31
озод/25,33,852,2,4,5,7,8,195,229,29,11,859,344,853,402,855,862,863,856,31,627,14,742,15
омад/25,852,35,36,39,43,49,58,2,839,94,95,97,4,123,858,5,7,254,10,11,12,859,853,862,15
орзу/25,9,254,29,311,11,859,531,539,540,547,14,846,777,16,18,19,861,21,22,23,24
офтоб/25,852,64,2,5,7,177,195,29,11,337,859,853,855,862,863,552,569,580,696,14,15,777
паҳно/25,852,29,859,855,863,846,742
пазмон/852,2,5,6,7,8,859,862,853,402,15
пинҳон/852,2,7,254,258,29,859,862,853,855,14,15
пиндошт/25,852,35,2,94,4,842,97,10,11,859,863
пок/852,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,29,859,344,853,862,855,453,456,863,580,31,14,742,752,15
пур/852,35,2,4,7,8,859,855,862,14,15
пурсавдо/860
раиятнавоз/862
ринд/2,29,11,859,344,853,360,862,31,627,15
роҳнамо/25,852,9,29,859,344,853,855,862,863,14,16,18,831,23
рози/2,4,9,223,10,11,30,319,859,14,846,860,16,18,20,21
руҳ/852,2,857,94,7,8,859,421,425,853,862,31,673,14,15
савор/25,852,2,7,8,29,11,859,344,853,409,855,862,863,580,31,14,15
санитар/25,852,859,853,855,862
сиёсатдон/863,15
симо/25,155,9,29,859,14,16,18,861,22,23,24
сипосгузор/852,2,4,11,859,344,862,855,853,31,627,15
суннат/25,852,29,859,853,862,409,855,863,584,14,15
суханчин/852,29,859,853,862,31,14
таҷрибаомӯз/852,859,344,862,853,855,863,31
тағо/25,33,852,9,223,311,313,859,344,862,853,855,863,856,16,822,823,18,861,22,23,24
танҳо/852,4,9,223,29,11,859,853,402,855,862,863,14,846,860,742,16,18,861,20,21,23,24
тануманд/29,859,855,863,14,742,15
тардоман/29,859,862,31
той/25,859,862,14,787
ту/852,2,4,858,7,9,29,11,859,853,14,846,860,16,18,20
унвонҷӯ/30,863
фардо/25,852,9,859,409,426,14,846,16,18,861,20,23
фаровон/852,2,4,7,29,859,862,853,855,14,742,752,15
форс/25,852,4,859,853,862,402,409,855,856,863,31,14,15
халқпарвар/859,862,855
хамӯш/852,2,4,859,344,853,382,855,863,31,627,15
харно/861
хато/25,9,223,244,245,246,29,309,859,344,345,855,14,846,16,18,861,23,24
хориҷ/852,35,2,11,859,344,862,853,402,409,855,863,14,15
худписанд/852,855,853,862,863,31,627,14,15
хушҳол/852,2,4,7,859,344,853,855,862,31,627,14,742,15
хушбахт/25,852,2,4,7,29,10,11,859,344,862,853,402,855,863,31,627,14,742,752,15
шӯх/852,64,75,2,5,7,248,29,859,344,853,862,369,402,411,855,863,31,627,14,742,15
шавқовар/4,29,859,862,627,14,742,752,15
шахс/25,852,2,94,4,5,7,29,859,862,853,402,855,856,863,31,627,14,15
шоҳин/25,33,2,7,29,859,863,14,15
шодоб/35,2,4,859,862,15
эъроз/852,859,863
якпо/846,860
